Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-148.01
Corporation operating a computer center; investment of funds; limitation.

Any bank may invest not more than ten percent of its capital and surplus either in stock of a corporation operating a computer center or directly, alone or with others, in a computer center. With written approval of the director, such additional percentage of its capital and surplus may be so invested as the director shall approve. Such investment is not subject to the provisions of sections 8-148, 8-149, and 8-150.

Laws 1967, c. 18, § 1, p. 116;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 45.